Missouri, session 2026, SB1237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 143.011, 143.021, and 143.171, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 143.011, 143.021, and 143.171, to read as
follows:
143.011. 1. For all tax years beginning on or before
December 31, 2026, a tax is hereby imposed for every taxable
year on the Missouri taxable income of every resident. The
tax shall be determined by applying the tax table or the
rate provided in section 143.021, which is based upon the
following rates:
If the Missouri The tax is:
taxable income is:
Not over $1,000.00 1 1/2% of the Missouri
taxable income
Over $1,000 but not $15 plus 2% of excess over
over $2,000 $1,000
Over $2,000 but not $35 plus 2 1/2% of excess
over $3,000 over $2,000
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1237 2
Over $3,000 but not $60 plus 3% of excess over
over $4,000 $3,000
Over $4,000 but not $90 plus 3 1/2% of excess
over $5,000 over $4,000
Over $5,000 but not $125 plus 4% of excess over
over $6,000 $5,000
Over $6,000 but not $165 plus 4 1/2% of excess
over $7,000 over $6,000
Over $7,000 but not $210 plus 5% of excess over
over $8,000 $7,000
Over $8,000 but not $260 plus 5 1/2% of excess
over $9,000 over $8,000
Over $9,000 $315 plus 6% of excess over
$9,000
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1
of this section to the contrary, beginning with the 2023
calendar year, but ending on or before December 31, 2026,
the top rate of tax pursuant to subsection 1 of this section
shall be four and ninety-five hundredths percent.
(2) The modification of tax rates made pursuant to
this subsection shall apply only to tax years that begin on
or after January 1, 2023, but before January 1, 2027.
(3) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax table provided in subsection 1 of
this section to effectuate the provisions of this
subsection. The top remaining rate of tax shall apply to
all income in excess of seven thousand dollars, as adjusted
pursuant to subsection 5 of this section.
3. (1) [In addition to the rate reduction under
subsection 2 of this section, beginning with the 2024

SB 1237 3
calendar year, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of
this section may be reduced by fifteen hundredths of a
percent. A reduction in the rate of tax shall take effect
on January first of a calendar year and such reduced rates
shall continue in effect until the next reduction occurs.
(2) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only occur if
the amount of net general revenue collected in the previous
fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net general
revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years prior to
such fiscal year by at least one hundred seventy-five
million dollars.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this
subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
4. (1) In addition to the rate reductions under
subsections 2 and 3 of this section, beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which a reduction is made pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section, the top rate of tax under subsection 1 of this
section may be further reduced over a period of years. Each
reduction in the top rate of tax shall be by one-tenth of a
percent and no more than one reduction shall occur in a
calendar year. No more than three reductions shall be made
under this subsection. Reductions in the rate of tax shall
take effect on January first of a calendar year and such
reduced rates shall continue in effect until the next
reduction occurs.
(2) (a) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only
occur if:

SB 1237 4
a. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
previous fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net
general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years
prior to such fiscal year by at least two hundred million
dollars; and
b. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
previous fiscal year exceeds the amount of net general
revenue collected in the fiscal year five years prior,
adjusted annually by the percentage increase in inflation
over the preceding five fiscal years.
(b) The amount of net general revenue collected
required by subparagraph a. of paragraph (a) of this
subdivision in order to make a reduction pursuant to this
subsection shall be adjusted annually by the percent
increase in inflation beginning with January 2, 2023.
(3) Any modification of tax rates under this
subsection shall only apply to tax years that begin on or
after a modification takes effect.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax tables under subsection 1 of this
section to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
The bracket for income subject to the top rate of tax shall
be eliminated once the top rate of tax has been reduced
100 below the rate applicable to such bracket, and the top
101 remaining rate of tax shall apply to all income in excess of
102 the income in the second highest remaining income bracket]
103 For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a
104 tax of four percent is hereby imposed on the Missouri
105 taxable income of every resident of this state. The tax
106 shall be determined by the application of the income
107 provisions provided under section 143.021.

SB 1237 5
108 (2) The department of revenue shall, by rule and by
109 posting on the department's website, adjust the appropriate
110 tax rate to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
111 4. (1) Beginning with the 2028 calendar year, the
112 rate of tax under subsection 3 of this section may be
113 further reduced over a period of years. Each reduction in
114 the rate of tax shall be by one-tenth of a percent and no
115 more than one reduction shall occur in a calendar year.
116 Reductions in the rate of tax shall take effect on January
117 first of a calendar year and such reduced rates shall
118 continue in effect until the next reduction occurs.
119 (2) (a) A reduction in the rate of tax shall only
120 occur if:
121 a. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
122 previous fiscal year exceeds the highest amount of net
123 general revenue collected in any of the three fiscal years
124 prior to such fiscal year by at least one hundred twenty
125 million dollars; and
126 b. The amount of net general revenue collected in the
127 previous fiscal year exceeds the amount of net general
128 revenue collected in the fiscal year five years prior,
129 adjusted annually by the percentage increase in inflation
130 over the preceding five fiscal years.
131 (b) The amount of net general revenue collected
132 required by subparagraph a. of paragraph (a) of this
133 subdivision in order to make a reduction pursuant to this
134 subsection shall be adjusted annually by the percent
135 increase in inflation beginning January 2, 2028.
136 (3) Any modification of the tax rate made pursuant to
137 this subsection shall apply only to tax years that begin on
138 or after the date a modification takes effect.

SB 1237 6
139 (4) The director of the department of revenue shall
140 adjust and publish the tax rate as adjusted pursuant to this
141 subsection to effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
142 5. Beginning with the 2017 calendar year, and ending
143 on or before December 31, 2026, the brackets of Missouri
144 taxable income identified in subsection 1 of this section
145 shall be adjusted annually by the percent increase in
146 inflation. The director shall publish such brackets
147 annually beginning on or after October 1, 2016.
148 Modifications to the brackets shall take effect on January
149 first of each calendar year and shall apply to tax years
150 beginning on or after the effective date of the new brackets.
151 6. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
152 (1) "CPI", the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
153 Consumers for the United States as reported by the Bureau of
154 Labor Statistics, or its successor index;
155 (2) "CPI for the preceding calendar year", the average
156 of the CPI as of the close of the twelve-month period ending
157 on August thirty-first of such calendar year;
158 (3) "Net general revenue collected", all revenue
159 deposited into the general revenue fund, less refunds and
160 revenues originally deposited into the general revenue fund
161 but designated by law for a specific distribution or
162 transfer to another state fund;
163 (4) "Percent increase in inflation", the percentage,
164 if any, by which the CPI for the preceding calendar year
165 exceeds the CPI for the year beginning September 1, 2014,
166 and ending August 31, 2015.
143.021. 1. Every resident having a taxable income
shall determine his or her tax from the rates provided in
section 143.011. For all tax years beginning on or before

SB 1237 7
December 31, 2022, there shall be no tax on a taxable income
of less than one hundred dollars.
2. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1
of section 143.011 to the contrary, for all tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2023, but on or before
December 31, 2026, there shall be no tax on taxable income
of less than or equal to one thousand dollars, as adjusted
pursuant to subsection 5 of section 143.011.
(2) The modifications made pursuant to this subsection
shall only apply to tax years that begin on or after January
1, 2023, but on or before December 31, 2026.
(3) The director of the department of revenue shall,
by rule, adjust the tax table provided in subsection 1 of
section 143.011 to effectuate the provisions of this
subsection.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 3 of
section 143.011 to the contrary, for all tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2027, there shall be no tax on
taxable income of less than or equal to one thousand dollars.
143.171. 1. For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 1994, and ending on or before December 31, 2018,
an individual taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for his
or her federal income tax liability under Chapter 1 of the
Internal Revenue Code for the same taxable year for which
the Missouri return is being filed, not to exceed five
thousand dollars on a single taxpayer's return or ten
thousand dollars on a combined return, after reduction for
all credits thereon, except the credit for payments of
federal estimated tax, the credit for the overpayment of any
federal tax, and the credits allowed by the Internal Revenue
Code by 26 U.S.C. Section 31, 26 U.S.C. Section 27, and 26
U.S.C. Section 34.

SB 1237 8
2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, for all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2019, but on or before December 31, 2026, an
individual taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction equal to a
percentage of his or her federal income tax liability under
Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code for the same taxable
year for which the Missouri return is being filed, not to
exceed five thousand dollars on a single taxpayer's return
or ten thousand dollars on a combined return, after
reduction for all credits thereon, except the credit for
payments of federal estimated tax, the credit for the
overpayment of any federal tax, and the credits allowed by
the Internal Revenue Code by 26 U.S.C. Section 31, 26 U.S.C.
Section 27, and 26 U.S.C. Section 34. The deduction
percentage is determined according to the following table:
If the Missouri gross income The deduction
on the return is: percentage is:
$25,000 or less 35 percent
From $25,001 to $50,000 25 percent
From $50,001 to $100,000 15 percent
From $100,001 to $125,000 5 percent
$125,001 or more 0 percent
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amount of any tax credits reducing a
taxpayer's federal tax liability pursuant to Public Law 116-
136 or 116-260, enacted by the 116th United States Congress,
for the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and
ending on or before December 31, 2020, and the amount of any

SB 1237 9
tax credits reducing a taxpayer's federal tax liability
under any other federal law that provides direct economic
impact payments to taxpayers to mitigate financial
challenges related to the COVID-19 pandemic shall not be
considered in determining a taxpayer's federal tax liability
for the purposes of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. For all tax years beginning on or after September
1, 1993, but on or before December 31, 2026, a corporate
taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for fifty percent of
its federal income tax liability under Chapter 1 of the
Internal Revenue Code for the same taxable year for which
the Missouri return is being filed after reduction for all
credits thereon, except the credit for payments of federal
estimated tax, the credit for the overpayment of any federal
tax, and the credits allowed by the Internal Revenue Code by
26 U.S.C. Section 31, 26 U.S.C. Section 27, and 26 U.S.C.
Section 34.
4. For all tax years beginning on or before December
31, 2026, if a federal income tax liability for a tax year
prior to the applicability of sections 143.011 to 143.996
for which he or she was not previously entitled to a
Missouri deduction is later paid or accrued, he or she may
deduct the federal tax in the later year to the extent it
would have been deductible if paid or accrued in the prior
year.
5. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, there shall be no federal income tax deduction for any
individual or corporate taxpayer under this section.
✓